Mississippi, session 2026, HB1025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  It shall be unlawful for any person to willfully and knowingly make false allegations that a felony or misdemeanor crime was committed because of the actual or perceived race, color, ancestry, ethnicity, religion, national origin or gender of any person.  Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a felony, and upon conviction, shall be imprisoned in the custody of the Department of Corrections for no less than one (1) year, no more than five (5) years, fined no less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) plus any additional amounts for attorney's fees, costs for law enforcement compensation, court costs and/or court fees created or caused as a result of the allegations. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.